Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2665.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1904-B(g)(1) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 1904-B. Neighborhood Improvement Zone Funds.* * *(g) Excess money.--Within 30 days of the end of each calendar year, any money remaining in the fund of each contracting authority at the end of the prior calendar year after the required payments under subsection (d)(2) were made in 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 the prior calendar year shall be refunded in the following manner:(1) Money shall first be [returned to the General Fund to the extent that the excess money is part of the transfer under subsection (d)(1).] used to satisfy all required payments under this article, including debt service, reserve requirements, contractual obligations and other obligation of the contracting authority. After satisfaction of the required payments, an amount equal to 25% of the baseline tax revenues received by the contracting authority for the preceding calendar year shall be transferred to the Small Business Opportunity Fund established under section 1910-B. Any balance of the money shall be distributed or expended as otherwise provided by law.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1910-B. Small Business Opportunity Program.(a) Establishment.--Each contracting authority shall establish a small business opportunity program within the authority to encourage the creation, expansion and retention of small businesses within the authority's designated neighborhood improvement zone.(b) Purpose.--The purpose of the program shall be to:(1) stimulate local entrepreneurship and promote job creation;(2) support early stage and microenterprise development; and(3) strengthen local economic vitality.(c) Eligibility.--A business shall be eligible to participate in the program if the business:20260HB2665PN3700 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) is a small business;(2) employs one or more full-time equivalent employees working at least 35 hours weekly; and(3) submits an application, as determined by the department, to the contracting authority.(d) Grants.--Excess money refunded to the contracting authority under section 1904-B(g)(1) shall be deposited into an account established by the contracting authority for the sole purpose of providing grants, to which the following shall apply:(1) The department shall settle, assess or determine the tax of an applicant under this subsection not later than 90 days after the filing of all required final returns or reports in accordance with section 806.1(a)(5) of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code.(2) Before an application is approved, the department shall make a finding that the applicant has filed all required State tax reports and returns for all applicable taxable years and paid any balance of State tax due as determined at settlement, assessment or determination by the department.(3) Any interest accrued on money within the account established under this subsection shall be retained for future use by the program.(4) If the Department of Community and Economic Development denies an application for a tax credit or tax benefit program, the applicant may appeal in a manner established by the Department of Community and Economic Development.(e) Reporting.--The contracting authority administering incentives under this section shall submit an annual report to 20260HB2665PN3700 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department and the General Assembly detailing:(1) the number of participating businesses;(2) total incentives awarded;(3) jobs created or retained; and(4) economic impact within the zone.(f) Regulations.--The department shall promulgate regulations necessary to implement and administer this section.(g) Confidentiality.--Notwithstanding any law providing for the confidentiality of tax records, the contracting authority and the local taxing authorities shall have access to any reports and certifications filed under this article, and the contracting authority shall have access to any State or local tax information, including taxpayer identification numbers of a qualified business located in the neighborhood improvement zone, filed by a qualified business in the neighborhood improvement zone solely for the purpose of documenting the certifications required by this article or determining the amount allocated to any uses specified under section 1904-B(e)(1). The independent auditing firm hired under section 1904-B(h) shall have access to any State or local tax information filed by a qualified business located in the neighborhood improvement zone, including taxpayer identification numbers, solely for the purpose of performing an audit required by section 1904-B(h). Any other use of the tax information shall be prohibited as provided under law.(h) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Small business." As defined under 12 Pa.C.S. § 2302 (relating to definitions).Section 3. This act shall take effect as follows:20260HB2665PN3700 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The addition of section 1910-B(g) of the act shall take effect in 30 days.(2) This section shall take effect immediately.(3) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2665PN3700 - 5 - 12345